Maryland, session 2025, SB0331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
24–401.
(a) (1) (i) This paragraph applies to an individual who is a member on or
before June 30, 2011.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0331*

SENATE BILL 331
(ii) A member may retire with a normal service retirement allowance
if:
1. on or before the date of retirement, the member:
A. has at least 22 years of eligibility service; or
B. is at least 50 years old; and
2. the member completes and submits a written application
to the Board of Trustees, on the form that the Board of Trustees provides, stating the date
when the member desires to retire.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to an individual who becomes a member
on or after July 1, 2011.
(ii) A member may retire with a normal service retirement allowance
if:
1. on or before the date of retirement, the member:
A. has at least 25 years of eligibility service; or
B. is at least 50 years old; and
2. the member completes and submits a written application
to the Board of Trustees, on the form that the Board of Trustees provides, stating the date
when the member desires to retire.
(b) (1) Subject to the approval of the Board of Trustees, the Secretary of State
Police may order a member who is at least 50 years old to retire on the first day of the
month after the member is notified of the Secretary’s order.
(2) Before approving the Secretary’s order, the Board of Trustees shall give
the member at least 30 days’ notice and an opportunity to be heard.
(c) [Except for the Secretary of State Police, a member shall retire with a normal
service retirement allowance not later than the first day of the month after the member
becomes 60 years old.
(d)] (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, on
retirement under this section, a member is entitled to receive a normal service retirement
allowance that equals 2.55% of the member’s average final compensation multiplied by each
year of the member’s years of creditable service.
(2) A member’s normal service retirement allowance may not exceed 71.4%
of the member’s average final compensation.

SENATE BILL 331 3
(3) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, on retirement under this
section, if a member’s annuity is greater than the member’s normal service retirement
allowance calculated under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the member’s normal service
retirement allowance shall equal the member’s annuity.
[(e)] (D) Subject to §§ 29–401, 29–402, and 29–403 of this article, a retiree, or a
beneficiary of a retiree, who retires on or before June 30, 1999 with a service retirement
allowance, shall receive an annual retirement allowance adjustment as of July 1, 1999, as
follows:
(1) for a retiree who has been retired not more than 5 years, $1,200;
(2) for a retiree who has been retired more than 5 years but not more than
10 years, $1,500;
(3) for a retiree who has been retired more than 10 years but not more than
15 years, $1,800; and
(4) for a retiree who has been retired more than 15 years, $2,100.
24–401.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “DROP” means the Deferred Retirement Option Program established
under this section.
(3) “DROP member” means a member of the State Police Retirement
System who:
(i) is eligible to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection
(c) of this section; and
(ii) elects to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection (e) of
this section.
(4) “EMPLOYMENT” MEANS EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION ELIGIBLE
FOR MEMBERSHIP IN THE STATE POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM.
(b) There is a DROP for eligible members of the State Police Retirement System.
(c) (1) (i) This paragraph applies to an individual who is a member of the
State Police Retirement System on or before June 30, 2011.
(ii) Except for the Secretary of State Police, a member of the State
Police Retirement System is eligible to participate in the DROP if the member[:

SENATE BILL 331
1.] has at least 22 and less than 32 years of [eligibility service;
and
2. is less than 60 years old] EMPLOYMENT.
(iii) The Secretary of State Police is eligible to participate in the
DROP if the Secretary has at least 22 years of [eligibility service] EMPLOYMENT.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to an individual who becomes a member
of the State Police Retirement System on or after July 1, 2011.
(ii) Except for the Secretary of State Police, a member of the State
Police Retirement System is eligible to participate in the DROP if the member[:
1.] has at least 25 years and less than 32 years of [eligibility
service; and
2. is less than 60 years old] EMPLOYMENT.
(iii) The Secretary of State Police is eligible to participate in the
DROP if the Secretary has at least 25 years of [eligibility service] EMPLOYMENT.
(d) An eligible member may elect to participate in the DROP for a period not to
exceed the lesser of:
(1) 7 years;
(2) the difference between 32 years and the member’s [eligibility service]
EMPLOYMENT as of the date of the member’s election to participate in the DROP and retire
from the State Police Retirement System; OR
(3) [the difference between age 60 and the member’s age as of the date of
the member’s election to participate in the DROP and retire from the State Police
Retirement System; or
(4)] a term selected by the member.
(g) Participation in the DROP ends if the DROP participant:
(1) separates from employment in accordance with the binding letter of
resignation submitted with the member’s election form;
(2) [except for the Secretary of State Police, attains age 60;
(3)] dies;

SENATE BILL 331 5
[(4)] (3) is terminated from employment by the Maryland State Police at
any time before the date specified on the member’s election form;
[(5)] (4) shortens the time period for participation in the DROP by
delivering to the Maryland State Police and the Board of Trustees written notice of the
intent of the DROP member to terminate employment; or
[(6)] (5) accepts a special disability retirement allowance as provided in
subsection (k) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.